Washington statutes.
RCW 4.24.330

Action for damages caused by criminal street gang tagging and graffiti.

(1) An adult or emancipated minor who commits criminal street gang tagging and graffiti under RCW 9A.48.105 by causing physical damage to the property of another is liable in addition to actual damages, for a penalty to the owner in the amount of the value of the damaged property not to exceed one thousand dollars, plus an additional penalty of not less than one hundred dollars nor more than two hundred dollars, plus all reasonable attorneys' fees and court costs expended by the owner.

(2) A conviction for violation of RCW 9A.48.105 is not a condition precedent to maintenance of a civil action authorized by this section.

(3) An owner demanding payment of a penalty under subsection (1) of this section shall give written notice to the person or persons from whom the penalty is sought.

[ 2008 c 276 s 307.]

NOTES:

Severability—Part headings, subheadings not law—2008 c 276: See notes following RCW 36.28A.200.